Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Licensure of Elevator Contractors and Mechanics

198B.4003.
Elevator or fixed guideway system work requiring licensed elevator mechanic and supervising general contractor — Exceptions.

Only a licensed elevator mechanic working under the general supervision of an elevator contractor may:

Erect, construct, alter, replace, maintain, remove, or dismantle any elevator or fixed guideway system contained within buildings or structures; or

Wire any elevator or fixed guideway system from the mainline feeder terminals on the controller.

A licensed elevator contractor shall not be required for removing or dismantling elevators or fixed guideway systems:

That are destroyed as a result of a complete demolition of a secured building or structure; or

Where the hoistway or wellway is demolished back to the basic support structure and does not allow access that could endanger the safety and welfare of a person.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 18, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.4005.
Elevator Advisory Committee — Members — Terms — Vacancies — Removal — Review of administrative regulations — Voting. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2011; 2011, ch. 100, § 14, effective June 8, 2011; repealed by 2017 ch. 169, § 114, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.4007.
Committee to meet at least quarterly — Special meetings. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 3, effective July 1, 2011; repealed by 2017 ch. 169, § 114, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.4009.
License required to work as elevator contractor or mechanic — Exemption for helper or apprentice — Applicability to public universities — Administrative regulations.

A person shall not work as an elevator contractor or elevator mechanic unless licensed by the department. A person may work as an elevator helper or apprentice without a license while under the general supervision of a licensed elevator mechanic.

A person who is a regular and bona fide full-time employee of a public university and who performs only routine maintenance on elevators for the public university shall be licensed as an elevator mechanic. The public university shall not be required to become licensed as an elevator contractor to employ a licensed elevator mechanic performing elevator maintenance for the public university under this subsection. An elevator mechanic who qualifies under this subsection shall only be authorized to conduct routine maintenance on any elevators for the public university, and shall be prohibited from performing any of the other activities authorized by KRS 198B.4003(1).

The department, with input and comments from the committee if required by KRS 198B.030(8), may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to implement KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 4, effective July 1, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 19, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.4011.
Application for licensure as elevator contractor — Contents — Eligibility requirements.

An application for licensure as an elevator contractor shall contain the following:

For an applicant who is a person or sole proprietor:

Name;

Residence; and

Business address of the applicant;

For an applicant that is a partnership:

Names of the partners;

Residential addresses of the partners; and

Business address of the partnership;

For an applicant that is a domestic corporation:

Name of the principal corporate officer;

Residential address of the principal corporate officer; and

Business address of the corporation;

For an applicant that is a corporation other than a domestic corporation:

Name of the corporation’s agent who is authorized to accept service of process and official notices on behalf of the corporation in the state; and

Physical address of the corporation’s authorized agent;

The number of years the applicant has engaged in the business of installing, maintaining, or servicing elevators or fixed guideway systems;

The approximate number of persons, if any, to be employed by the elevator contractor applicant;

Proof that he or she has complied with workers’ compensation and unemployment insurance laws;

Evidence that the applicant is covered by general liability, personal injury, and property damage insurance;

Criminal record of convictions, if any, as verified through a criminal background check conducted by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The cost of the background check shall be paid by the applicant; and

Upon request by the department, supplemental documentation of information required by this section.

An applicant for an elevator contractor license shall:

Employ at least one (1) licensed elevator mechanic who performs the work described in KRS 198B.4003; and

Have proof of compliance with insurance requirements of KRS 198B.4027.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 5, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.4013.
Application for licensure as elevator mechanic — Contents — Eligibility requirements.

An application for licensure as an elevator mechanic shall contain the following:

Name;

Residential address;

Name and address of the applicant’s employer, if employed;

The number of years the applicant has engaged in the business of installing, maintaining, or servicing elevators or fixed guideway systems;

The types of elevators or fixed guideway systems the applicant installed, maintained, or serviced during the applicant’s years of experience;

Identification of the type of license, whether an elevator mechanic license or an accessibility and residential elevator mechanic license, sought by the applicant; and

Upon request by the department, supplemental documentation of information required by this section.

An applicant for an elevator mechanic license or an accessibility and residential elevator mechanic license shall demonstrate one (1) or more of the following to be eligible for licensure:

Proof the applicant for an elevator mechanic license has not less than thirty-six (36) months of work experience in the elevator industry, in construction, maintenance, service, repair, or any combination of these activities as verified by current and previous employers, or equivalent experience while serving in the United States military services; and
(a) 1.

Proof the applicant for an elevator mechanic license has not less than thirty-six (36) months of work experience in the elevator industry, in construction, maintenance, service, repair, or any combination of these activities as verified by current and previous employers, or equivalent experience while serving in the United States military services; and

Passage of a written, oral, or computerized examination administered by the department or the department’s designee based upon the most recent referenced codes and standards for full licensure;

Proof the applicant for an accessibility and residential elevator mechanic license has not less than twelve (12) months of work experience in the elevator industry, in construction, maintenance, service, repair, or any combination of the activities verified by current and previous employers, or equivalent experience while serving in the United States military services; and
(b) 1.

Proof the applicant for an accessibility and residential elevator mechanic license has not less than twelve (12) months of work experience in the elevator industry, in construction, maintenance, service, repair, or any combination of the activities verified by current and previous employers, or equivalent experience while serving in the United States military services; and

Passage of a written, oral, or computerized examination administered by the department or the department’s designee based upon the most recent referenced codes and standards for the accessibility and residential elevator mechanic license the applicant seeks;

Proof the applicant has worked without direct and immediate supervision as an elevator constructor, maintenance, or repair person for not less than three (3) years immediately prior to July 1, 2011;

Certificate of completion from a nationally recognized training program for the elevator industry such as the National Elevator Industry Educational Program, National Association of Elevator Contractors, or an equivalent program approved by the commissioner for elevator mechanic licensure;

For accessibility and residential elevator mechanic licensure, a certificate of completion from a nationally recognized training program specifically designed for the accessibility and private residence lift, such as the National Association of Elevator Contractors, or an equivalent program approved by the commissioner; or

Certificate of completion of an apprenticeship program for elevator mechanics, having standards substantially equal to those of KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540; and
(f) 1.

Certificate of completion of an apprenticeship program for elevator mechanics, having standards substantially equal to those of KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540; and

Proof of registration with the Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training, United States Department of Labor, or a state apprenticeship council.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 6, effective July 1, 2011; 2013, ch. 31, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.

198B.4015.
Qualifications for licensure prior to July 1, 2012.

An applicant for licensure as an elevator contractor under KRS 198B.4011 or as an elevator mechanic under KRS 198B.4013 who applies to the department prior to July 1, 2012, shall be licensed by the department without completing the licensure requirements as established in KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540, if the applicant is currently licensed, certified, or registered as an elevator contractor or elevator mechanic in another state whose standards are substantially equal to those in KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540.

Prior to July 1, 2012, an applicant who does not qualify for licensure under KRS 198B.4011 or 198B.4013 or subsection (1) of this section shall qualify for licensure by showing a minimum of three (3) years of verifiable experience engaging in business as an elevator contractor or elevator mechanic in this state.

After July 1, 2012, licensure under this section shall cease.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 7, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.4017.
Reciprocity — Terms and conditions.

Any person, sole proprietor, partnership, or corporation holding a valid elevator or fixed guideway system license from a state that has licensing, educational, and experience requirements substantially equal to or greater than those of KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540, and which grants licensing privileges to persons licensed in this state, may be issued an equivalent license in this state upon terms and conditions determined by the department. The terms and conditions shall be promulgated as an administrative regulation by the department.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 8, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.4019.
Emergency elevator mechanic license — Proof of competency — Time and geographic limitations — Renewal.

The department shall issue emergency elevator mechanic licenses whenever an emergency is declared by the Governor due to disaster, act of God, or work stoppage, and the number of persons in the state holding licenses granted by the department is determined by the commissioner to be insufficient to cope with the emergency.

Elevator contractors shall respond as necessary to ensure the safety of the public.

Any person confirmed by a licensed elevator contractor to have a combination of documented experience and education to perform elevator work without direct and immediate supervision shall seek an emergency elevator mechanic’s license from the department within five (5) business days after commencing work under this emergency provision if the work requires a license under ordinary circumstances. The elevator contractor employing the elevator mechanic shall furnish proof of competency as required by the department.

Each emergency elevator mechanic license shall be valid for a period of forty-five (45) days from the date of issuance and for the particular elevators or geographical areas designated by the department, and otherwise shall entitle the licensee to the rights and privileges of an elevator mechanic licensed under KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540.

The department may renew an emergency elevator mechanic license during the existence of a continuing emergency.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 9, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.4021.
Temporary elevator mechanic license — Proof of competency — License valid for one year — Renewal.

An elevator contractor shall notify the department when the contractor has no licensed personnel available to perform elevator work. The elevator contractor may request that the department issue temporary elevator mechanic licenses to persons confirmed by the licensed elevator contractor to have a combination of documented experience and education to perform elevator work without direct and immediate supervision.

Any person confirmed by an elevator contractor to have a combination of documented experience and education to perform elevator work without direct and immediate supervision shall immediately seek a temporary elevator mechanic license from the department.

Each temporary license shall be valid for a period of one (1) year and only while the licensee is employed by the licensed elevator contractor that confirmed the individual as qualified.

The temporary license shall be renewable for additional terms of one (1) year each until there is no shortage of ordinary license holders.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 10, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.4023.
Renewal, expiration, termination, and reinstatement of license issued under KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540 — Inactive license.

A person licensed under KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540 shall annually, on or before the last day of the licensee’s birth month, renew his or her license.

A sixty (60) day grace period shall be allowed after the anniversary date of the license, during which time a licensee may continue to practice and may renew his or her license upon meeting the requirements promulgated through administrative regulations by the department.

A license not renewed before the end of the sixty (60) day grace period shall terminate based on the failure of the licensee to renew in a timely manner. Upon termination of a license, the licensee shall be ineligible to practice in the Commonwealth.

After the sixty (60) day grace period, a former licensee with a terminated license may have the license reinstated upon meeting the requirements promulgated through administrative regulations by the department. An applicant for reinstatement after termination of the license shall not be required to submit to any examination as a condition for reinstatement, if the reinstatement application is made within three (3) years from the date of termination.

A suspended license shall be subject to expiration and termination and shall be renewed as provided in this section. Renewal shall not entitle the licensee to engage in the practice until the suspension has ended or is otherwise removed by the department and the right to practice is restored by the department.

A revoked license shall be subject to reinstatement, expiration, or termination but shall not be renewed.

An applicant for renewal or reinstatement of a license shall show evidence of completing at least eight (8) hours of continuing education provided by the National Elevator Industry Educational Program, National Association of Elevator Contractors, or another provider approved by the department. The department shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the permissible content of continuing education programs and the qualifications of the providers.

When applicable, an applicant for renewal or reinstatement of an elevator contractor license shall submit proof that the applicant has complied with workers’ compensation and unemployment insurance laws and administrative regulations and has obtained general liability coverage of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) for injury or death of any number of persons in any one (1) occurrence, with coverage of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for property damage in any one (1) occurrence.

The department may, through the promulgation of administrative regulations:

Establish an inactive license for licensees who are not actively engaging in the elevator or fixed guideway system business, but who wish to maintain their license;

Determine continuing education requirements for reactivation;

Waive the insurance requirements established in subsection (8) of this section for inactive licensees; and

Establish reactivation procedures.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 11, effective July 1, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 20, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.4025.
Continuing education requirements — Waiver — Revocation of program approval if continuing education records falsified.

An applicant for the renewal of an elevator contractor license or elevator mechanic license shall submit a certificate of completion from a continuing education course or courses that instruct licensees on new and existing applicable administrative regulations of the department.

Licensed elevator contractors and licensed elevator mechanics shall complete at least eight (8) hours of continuing education annually. Continuing education for a renewal year shall be attended and completed during that renewal year.

Continuing education courses shall be taught by instructors employed by continuing education providers that may include but shall not be limited to association seminars and labor training programs. Continuing education programs provided by the National Elevator Industry Educational Program or the National Association of Elevator Contractors shall be approved to meet the requirements for continuing education. The department may approve other education programs that meet its requirements established through administrative regulation under KRS 198B.4023(7).

A licensee who is unable to complete the continuing education requirements for renewal under this section prior to the expiration of his or her license due to temporary disability may apply for a waiver from the department. The waiver shall be on a form provided by the department, with a notarized signature of the licensee, and accompanied by a certified statement from a physician attesting to the temporary disability. Application for medical waiver shall be received by the department prior to the final day of the licensee’s birth month. Upon termination of the temporary disability, the licensee shall submit a supplementary certified statement attesting to the termination of the temporary disability and proof of attendance of at least eight (8) hours of continuing education.

Falsifying or knowingly allowing another to falsify continuing education attendance records or certificates of completion shall constitute grounds for revocation of program approval required under this section.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 12, effective July 1, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 21, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.4027.
Proof of insurance — Minimum coverage.

Elevator contractors shall submit proof of insurance to the department for an insurance policy issued by an insurance company or other legal entity permitted to transact insurance business in Kentucky, providing:

General liability coverage of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) for injury or death of any number of persons in any one (1) occurrence;

Coverage of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for property damage in any one (1) occurrence; and

Statutory workers’ compensation insurance coverage.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 13, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.4029.
Construction of KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540.

The provisions of KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540 shall not be construed to relieve or lessen the responsibility or liability of any person, partnership, or corporation owning, operating, controlling, maintaining, erecting, constructing, installing, altering, inspecting, testing, or repairing any elevator, fixed guideway system, or other related mechanisms for damages to person or property caused by any specifically related defect.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 14, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.4031.
Disciplinary hearings — Summary suspension — Elevator or fixed guideway system work by unlicensed individual — Cease-and-desist order.

The department shall conduct disciplinary hearings in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The commissioner may summarily suspend a license for up to ninety (90) days before a final adjudication or during an appeal of the commissioner’s determination if he or she believes that allowing the licensee to keep an active license would represent a clear and immediate danger to the public’s health, safety, or property if the licensee is allowed to continue working.

The commissioner shall issue a letter to cease and desist with notice of opportunity to be heard in accordance with a KRS Chapter 13B hearing, to any individual if the commissioner determines that:

An individual is not licensed under the provisions of this chapter; and

The individual is engaged in, or believed to be engaged in, activities for which an elevator contractor’s or elevator mechanic’s license is required under KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540.

After completion of the KRS Chapter 13B hearing, if it is determined that the individual’s activities are subject to licensure under KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540, the commissioner shall issue a cease-and-desist order that identifies the individual and specifically states the activities that are subject to the order.

A cease-and-desist order issued under this section shall be enforceable in the Circuit Court of the county of the licensee’s place of business in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 15, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.4033.
Suspension, revocation, or nonrenewal of license — Grounds — Hearing — Appeal.

Subject to a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, the commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the license of an elevator contractor or elevator mechanic for any of the following actions by the licensee:

Use of false evidence or misrepresentation in an application for an elevator contractor’s or elevator mechanic’s license;

Attempting to transfer authority granted to the licensed contractor or mechanic to another individual;

Incompetency or negligence relating to elevator service, installation, repair, or maintenance as determined by the commissioner;

Conviction of a felony after July 1, 2011;

Fraudulent or dishonest practices while engaging in the business of elevator service, installation, repair, or maintenance;

Aiding or abetting any person attempting to evade the provisions of KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540; or

Violating any provision of KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540 or the administrative regulations promulgated under KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540.

Subject to a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, the commissioner shall revoke the license of an elevator contractor or elevator mechanic who continues to work as if holding a valid license during a suspension imposed by the commissioner.

Any licensee who is aggrieved by a final order of the commissioner, resulting in the suspension, refusal to renew, or revocation of his or her license may appeal to the Circuit Court of the county of the licensee’s place of business in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

Any reason for licensee discipline under subsection (1) of this section may also serve as the reason to deny an initial application for licensure as an elevator contractor or elevator mechanic.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 16, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.4035.
Reapplication after revocation of license.

If the license of an elevator contractor or elevator mechanic is revoked for any reason, the former licensee may, at the conclusion of the revocation period, reapply for his or her license.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 17, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.4037.
Elevator safety program trust fund.

The elevator safety program trust fund is created in the State Treasury as a separate revolving fund to be administered by the department. The trust fund shall consist of amounts deposited in the fund as provided in KRS 198B.530 and any other proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations, or other money made available for the purposes of the trust fund.

Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section.

Any interest earnings of the trust fund shall become a part of the trust fund and shall not lapse.

Trust fund moneys shall be used and are hereby appropriated for reasonable administrative expenses associated with the elevator safety.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 116, § 18, effective July 1, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 22, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.410.
Inspectors — Certificates of competency — Application — Examination — Issuance — Reexamination.

A person shall not act either as a general inspector or as a special inspector of elevators or fixed guideway systems unless he or she holds a certificate of competency from the department.

Application for examination as an inspector of elevators shall be in writing, accompanied by a fee of ten dollars ($10), upon a form furnished by the department, stating the school education of the applicant, a list of his or her employers, his or her period of employment, and the position held with each. An applicant shall also submit a letter from one (1) or more of his or her previous employers attesting to his or her character and experience.

Applications that contain any willful falsification or untruthful statements shall be rejected. The applicant, if the department deems his or her history and experience sufficient, shall be tested by means of a written examination dealing with the construction, installation, operation, maintenance, and repair of elevators, fixed guideway systems, and their appurtenances. The applicant shall be accepted or rejected on the merits of his or her application and examination.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the training and certification requirements for inspectors of fixed guideway systems.

The department shall issue a certificate of competency in the inspection of elevators to any applicant found competent upon examination. A rejected applicant shall be entitled, after the expiration of ninety (90) days, and upon payment of an examination fee of ten dollars ($10), to another examination. If an applicant fails to pass the prescribed examination on a second attempt, he or she shall not be permitted to apply for another examination for a period of one (1) year after the second failure.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 2; 1980, ch. 295, § 86, effective July 15, 1980; 2006, ch. 157, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 262, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 116, §
20, effective July 1, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.420.
State Elevator and Fixed Guideway System Inspection Program — Qualifications of director — Appointment of general inspectors — Investigation of alleged violations of KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540.

The department shall administer all aspects of the State Elevator and Fixed Guideway System Inspection Program.

The program shall be directed by a person with at least five (5) years’ experience in the inspection or construction, installation, maintenance, and repair of elevators, fixed guideway systems, and their appurtenances.

The commissioner may appoint and hire, from the holders of certificates of competency, general inspectors of elevators.

Any person may request an investigation into an alleged violation of KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540 by giving notice to the department of the violation or danger. This notice shall be:

In writing;

Set forth with particularity regarding the grounds for the notice; and

Signed by the person making the request.

If, upon receipt of the request for investigation, the department determines that there is evidence that a violation or danger exists, the department shall conduct an investigation in accordance with KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540 as soon as practicable. If the department finds no grounds to substantiate that a violation or danger exists, the department shall notify the requesting party in writing of the findings within fourteen (14) calendar days of the determination.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 3; 1976, ch. 299, § 78; 1980, ch. 295, § 87, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 143, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 72, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2006, ch. 157, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 263, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 116, §
21, effective July 1, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 24, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.430.
Employment of special inspectors.

From the holders of certificates of competency in the inspection of elevators, any company which is authorized to insure elevators in the state may designate persons to inspect elevators covered by that company’s policies, and the municipal government of any city may designate persons to inspect elevators in that city.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 4; 2017 ch. 169, § 25, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.440.
Suspension or revocation of certificates.

A certificate to serve as an inspector issued under KRS 198B.410 may be suspended or revoked by the department for the incompetence or untrustworthiness of the holder thereof, or for the falsification of any matter or statement contained in his or her application or in a report of any inspection.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 5; 1976, ch. 299, § 79; 2006, ch. 157, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 264, effective July 15, 2010.

198B.450.
Lost or destroyed certificates.

If a certificate issued under KRS 198B.410 is lost or destroyed, a new one shall be issued in its place by the department without another examination, upon the payment of a fee of one dollar ($1).

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 6; 1980, ch. 295, § 88, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 265, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 116, §
22, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.460.
Registration of elevators and fixed guideway systems — Time of registration.

The owner or user of any elevator or fixed guideway system shall register with the department every elevator or fixed guideway system operated by him or her, giving the type, capacity, description, name of manufacturer, and purpose for which each is used. The registration shall be made on a form to be furnished by the department.

If the department has the information required by subsection (1) of this section in its possession, the owner or lessee shall not be required to duplicate the information. Elevators and fixed guideway systems for which construction has begun after July 1, 2011, shall be registered at the time they are completed and placed in service.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 9; 1976, ch. 299, § 80; 2006, ch. 157, § 5, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 266, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 116, §
23, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.470.
Annual inspection — Exemptions.

Except as indicated under subsection (2) of this section, every passenger elevator, freight elevator, moving sidewalk, fixed guideway system, and escalator shall be inspected once every twelve (12) months.

The following shall be exempt from the annual inspection requirements of subsection (1) of this section:

Material lifts;

Grain elevators;

Mine elevators;

Stage elevators;

Orchestra elevators;

Organ console elevators;

Elevators and lifting devices solely in residential buildings used by the occupants of a dwelling unit, except where the lifting device is used or accessible by the occupants of more than one (1) dwelling unit;

Freight elevators on the licensed premises of a distillery licensed under KRS 243.030(1);

Non-federally regulated, funicular fixed guideway systems; and

Passenger elevators, freight elevators, moving sidewalks, fixed guideway systems, and escalators installed in federal properties and projects.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 10; 1976, ch. 232, § 4; 2006, ch. 157, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 116, § 24, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.480.
Report of inspection — Hearing on construction plans and specifications — Findings and orders of department.

Every inspector shall forward to the department a full report of each inspection made of any passenger elevator or fixed guideway system, showing the exact condition of the elevator or fixed guideway system, and the inspector shall leave a copy of the report at the elevator or fixed guideway system on the day the inspection is completed.

If any passenger elevator or fixed guideway system requires certain changes or repairs to make it reasonably safe to operate, recommendations shall be made by the inspector upon his or her report and a copy of the report as approved by the department shall be given to the owner or operator of the elevator or fixed guideway system, and, unless appealed, upon compliance with the report and upon the payment of the fees required by law, the department shall issue a certificate of operation for a capacity not to exceed that named in the report of inspection . This certificate shall be valid for one (1) year after the date of inspection.

If construction plans or an application of specifications is not approved, the department shall state in writing the necessary changes to obtain approval and the owner or operator shall be given a copy of the necessary changes, and, unless appealed, upon compliance by the owner or operator, the department shall approve the plans or specifications and issue a permit for construction.

Any owner or operator, within twenty (20) days from receipt of the copy of the report or statement of changes in plans or specifications, may make written application to the department upon forms to be furnished by the department for a hearing on the report or the statement regarding changes in plans or specifications as to whether the elevator or fixed guideway system in question is reasonably safe, or whether the elevator or fixed guideway system, if constructed in accordance with the plans and specifications, would be reasonably safe. The department shall promptly consider the application and schedule a hearing to be conducted consistent with the provisions of this section and KRS Chapter 13B.

If it appears from the evidence presented at the hearing that the elevator or fixed guideway system will be reasonably safe to operate without those changes or repairs shown in the report or by making only a part or all of the changes, or if none or only a part of all the changes in the plans or specifications are found necessary to make the elevator reasonably safe, the department shall issue its final order accordingly. If the final order requires changes or repairs to be made in the elevator or fixed guideway system or changes in the plans or specifications of either, the department shall, upon the payment of the required fees, issue a certificate of operation when the order has been executed or issue its approval of the plans or specifications. If the final order of the department has been affirmed or modified by appeal on the grounds of reasonable safety considered by the department, then the department shall, upon compliance with the final order and the payment of required fees, issue the certificate of operation or issue its approval of the plans and specifications; but, if the order of the department has been vacated, the certificate of operation, upon the payment of fees or approval of plans and specifications, shall be issued immediately. No elevator or fixed guideway system shall be operated after being inspected without bearing a conspicuously posted certificate of operation, except pending a hearing on the issuance of the certificate.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 11; 1976, ch. 232, § 5; 1976, ch. 299, § 81; 1996, ch. 318, § 85, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 157, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 267, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 116, §
25, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.490.
Administrative regulations — Review of standards — Consistency with building code.

The department shall make, alter, amend, or repeal rules and administrative regulations exclusively for the safety and inspection of passenger elevators and fixed guideway systems. The department shall have the authority to prescribe, by administrative regulation, a reasonable fee to be charged for each inspection. All fees established and regulated by this section shall be paid to the department, made payable to the Kentucky State Treasurer, except as may be provided in a specific written agreement between the commissioner and any agency authorized to inspect elevators or fixed guideway systems by this chapter.

The department shall consult with engineering authorities and organizations concerned with standard safety codes, rules, and administrative regulations governing the operation, maintenance, servicing, construction, alteration, installation, and inspection of elevators and fixed guideway systems, and the qualifications that are necessary for an elevator mechanic, contractor, and inspector.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the approved equipment regulated by KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540. These administrative regulations shall include the following, except as modified under subsection (4) of this section:

Safety Code for Elevators and Escalators, ASME A17.1/CSA B44;

Safety Code for Existing Elevators and Escalators, ASME A17.3;

Performance-Based Safety Code for Elevators and Escalators, ASME 17.7/CSA B44.7;

Safety Standards for Platform Lifts and Stairway Chairlifts, ASME A18.1;

Standard for the Qualification of Elevator Inspectors, ASME OEI-1; and

Automated People Mover Standards, ASCE 21.

The department and the committee shall review the latest editions of any standard listed in subsection (3) of this section within twelve (12) months of that standard’s effective date. Upon completion of reviews, the committee shall give the department its recommendations, after which the department may adopt or modify the standard.

All administrative regulations issued by the department relating to KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540 shall be consistent with the standards of safety as established in 815 KAR 10:060 and the Uniform State Building Code established in KRS 198B.050.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 12; 1976, ch. 232, § 2; 1978, ch. 123, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 89, effective July 15, 1980; 2006, ch. 157, § 8, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 268, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 116, § 26, effective July 1, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 26, effective June 29, 2017.